Massachusetts, session 194th, H5333.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Section 45 of the Holyoke City Charter shall be amended by deleting the
entire section and inserting the following:
“Sec. 45 Eligibility to hold office.
No person shall be eligible to any of the elected offices of city government unless they
are a citizen and have been a resident of the city for at least two years.”
SECTION 2: The General Court may make clerical or editorial changes of form only to
the bill, unless the Mayor and City Council approve amendments before enactment by the
General Court. The Mayor and City Council are hereby authorized to approve amendments
which shall be within the scope of the general public objectives of this petition.
SECTION 3: This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 1